Wyoming, session 2025, SF0055.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 17-28-112 is created to read:

17-28-112. Third-party filer registration.

(a) As used in this section, "third-party filer"
means a natural person who receives compensation to file
documents with the secretary of state on behalf of one (1)
SF0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0114
or more business entities and who is not a direct employee,
shareholder, director, member or otherwise under the direct
management or supervision of the business entity on whose
behalf the documents are filed. A "third-party filer" may
include an employee of a commercial registered agent or
another business entity. A "third-party filer" shall not
include an attorney who is a member in good standing of the
Wyoming state bar or a person holding an active certificate
of certified public accountant under the laws of this
state.

(b) A third-party filer shall register with the
secretary of state after filing ten (10) documents with the
secretary of state in one (1) calendar year. If a
third-party filer files ten (10) documents with the
secretary of state in one (1) calendar year, no further
filings shall be accepted from the third-party filer unless
the third-party filer is registered as required under this
section. The secretary of state may reject any document
filed in violation of this subsection up to ninety (90)
days after discovery of the violation.

SF0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0114
(c) A third-party filer shall obtain a registration
by filing an application with the secretary of state. The
application shall be notarized, executed and sworn under
penalty of perjury and contain the following information:

(i) The third-party filer's legal name;

(ii) The third-party filer's home address, phone
number and email address;

(iii) If applicable, the third-party filer's
business address, phone number and email address;

(iv) A copy of the third-party filer's valid
state issued driver's license or identification card.

(d) Every applicant for registration under this
section shall pay a filing fee as set by rule adopted
pursuant to this chapter. The fee shall be designed to
recover the cost of administering the provisions of this
section relating to third-party filers and shall not exceed
fifty dollars ($50.00). If an application is withdrawn or
denied, the secretary of state shall retain the entire fee.
SF0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0114

(e) A registered third-party filer shall notify the
secretary of state of any changes to the information
included in the third-party filer's application under
subsection (c) of this section as required by rule adopted
pursuant to this chapter.

(f) The secretary of state may impose a civil penalty
not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each
violation if a third-party filer who is required to
register under subsection (b) of this section files or
attempts to file a document without registering.

(g) The secretary of state shall hold third-party
filer registration records confidential. The secretary of
state may release third-party filer registration records
only pursuant to a court ordered subpoena or to a bona fide
law enforcement agency for use in a criminal investigation.

Section 2. The secretary of state shall promulgate
all rules and forms necessary to implement this act.

SF0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0114
Section 3. There is appropriated one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000.00) from the general fund to the
secretary of state for the period beginning with the
effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2026 to
be expended only for purposes of developing the filing
system necessary to administer this act. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose
and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the secretary of state's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

SF0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0114
Section 4.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0055